de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik > PoE-Adapter: PoE-Konverter; PoE-Extender; PoE-Injektoren; PoE-Splitter
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele > Adaptoare Power Over Ethernet: Convertori PoE; Prelungitoare PoE; Injectoare PoE; Splittere PoE
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede > Injetores e divisores de energia: Conversores Power Over Ethernet; Extensores Power Over Ethernet; Injetores Power Over Ethernet; Divisores Power Over Ethernet
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク > パワーインジェクタ・スプリッタ: PoEコンバーター; PoEエクステンダー; PoEインジェクター; PoEスプリッター
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete > Ethernetové adaptéry napájania: Power over Ethernet konvertory; Power over Ethernet predlžovače; Power over Ethernet injektory; Power over Ethernet splittery
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路 > 乙太網電力轉接器: 乙太網供電轉換器; 乙太網供電延長器; 乙太網供電注入器; 乙太網供電分隔器
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus > PoE-adapterit: Power Over Ethernet -muunnin; Power Over Ethernet -jatkaja; Power Over Ethernet -injektori; Power Over Ethernet -jakaja
lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai > Maitinimo eternetu adapteriai: PoE keitikliai; PoE prailgintuvai; PoE injektoriai; PoE skirstytuvai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje > Adapterji za napajanje prek etherneta: Pretvorniki Power over Ethernet; Podaljševalci Power over Ethernet; Injektorji Power over Ethernet; Razdelilniki Power over Ethernet
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση > Προσαρμογείς τροφοδοσίας μέσω Ethernet (PoE): Μετατροπείς Power Over Ethernet; Επεκτάσεις Power Over Ethernet; Εγχυτές Power Over Ethernet; Διαχωριστές Power Over Ethernet
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络 > 以太网供电适配器: 以太网供电转换器; 以太网供电延长器; 以太网供电注入器; 以太网供电分离器
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés > Power Over Ethernet adapterek: Power Over Ethernet átalakítók; Power Over Ethernet hosszabbítók; Power Over Ethernet injektorok; Power Over Ethernet elosztók
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje > Power Over Ethernet adapteri: PoE pretvornici; PoE pojačivači; PoE injektori; PoE razdjelnici
cs: Elektronika > Sítě > Napájecí zdroje a rozbočovače: Převodníky Power Over Ethernet; Prodlužovače Power Over Ethernet; Injektory Power Over Ethernet; Splittery Power Over Ethernet
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng > Bộ tiếp hợp cấp nguồn qua cáp ethernet: Bộ chuyển đổi Power over Ethernet; Bộ mở rộng Power over Ethernet; Bộ tiêm Power over Ethernet; Bộ tách Power over Ethernet
tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri > Ethernet Üzerinden Güç Adaptörleri: Power Over Ethernet Dönüştürücüleri; Power Over Ethernet Genişleticileri; Power Over Ethernet Enjektörleri; Power Over Ethernet Bölücüleri
it: Elettronica > Rete > Adattatori PoE: Convertitori PoE; Estensori PoE; Iniettori PoE; Splitter PoE
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk > Ströminjektorer och strömdelare: Power over Ethernet-omvandlare; Power over Ethernet-förlängare; Power over Ethernet-injektorer; Power over Ethernet-delare
da: Elektronik > Netværk > Strømfødere og -fordelere: Power over Ethernet-konvertere; Power over Ethernet-forlængere; Power over Ethernet-injektorer; Power over Ethernet-fordelere
ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹 > POE 어댑터: PoE 컨버터; PoE 익스텐더; PoE 인젝터; PoE 스플리터
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede > Adaptadores de alimentação via internet POE: Conversores power over ethernet; Extensores power over ethernet; Injetores power over ethernet; Divisores power over ethernet
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование > Адаптеры PoE: Конвертеры PoE; Удлинители PoE; Инжекторы PoE; Разветвители PoE
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux > Adaptateurs PoE: Convertisseurs PoE; Extendeurs PoE; Injecteurs PoE; Séparateurs PoE
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване > Ethernet захранващи адаптери: Power Over Ethernet конвертори; Power Over Ethernet удължители; Power Over Ethernet инжектори; Power Over Ethernet сплитери
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk > Strøm over Ethernet-adaptere: Power over ethernet-konvertere; Power over ethernet-forlengere; Power over ethernet-injektorer; Power over ethernet-splittere
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย > อะแดปเตอร์การจ่ายไฟบนสาย LAN: ตัวแปลงสัญญาณ PoE; ตัวขยายสัญญาณ PoE; ตัวฉีดสัญญาณ PoE; ตัวแยกสัญญาณ PoE
en: Electronics > Networking > Power Over Ethernet Adapters: Power Over Ethernet Converters; Power Over Ethernet Extenders; Power Over Ethernet Injectors; Power Over Ethernet Splitters
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken > Stroominjectoren en -splitters: Power over ethernet-converters; Power over ethernet-extenders; Power over ethernet-injectors; Power over ethernet-splitters
pl: Elektronika > Sieci > Zasilacze typu power injector i power splitter: Konwertery Power Over Ethernet; Przedłużacze Power Over Ethernet; Zastrzykowacze Power Over Ethernet; Rozdzielacze Power Over Ethernet
es: Electrónica > Redes > Adaptadores de Power over Ethernet: Convertidores PoE; Extensores PoE; Inyectores PoE; Divisores PoE